zza/zza-Latn.aff
# =======================================================================================
#                    Spell detection and correction for Zazaki
#                          	List of affixes
# =======================================================================================
#                             Version 0.1.1 (Last updated on 19-06-2025)
#                             <https://github.com/sinaahmadi/KurdishHunspell>
# =======================================================================================
# Copyright 2025 Veysel YILDIZHAN & Sina Ahmadi
# This work is licensed under a Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 International License.
# =======================================================================================
# Description of the flags which are identitical to those of the Zazaki Hunspell (see the same repository):
#	N: Noun
#	M: Masculine noun
#	F: Feminine noun (in Kurmanji and Zazaki)
#	V: present stem of verbs
#	I: past stem of intransitive verbs
#	T: past stem of transitive verbs
#	A: adjectives
#	R: adverbs
#	E: numerals
#	C: conjunction
#	D: interjection
#	B: pronouns
#	E: numerals
#	P: adpositions
#	G: particle
#	X: infinitive
#	Z: proper names
#	W: exceptional cases like were 'come.imp.2s' or exceptional present stems for imperative forms
#########################################################################################
SET UTF-8
LANG zza
COMPLEXPREFIXES
TRY abcçdeêfghiîjklmnopqrsştuûvwxyzABCÇDEÊFGHIÎJKLMNOPQRSŞTUÛVWXYZ
KEY iîêeaoûjczsmnkçbvw|qwertyuiopxwû,|asdfghjklşî|zxcvbnmêç.

WORDCHARS ,.-[]|/;"%`'

BREAK 1
BREAK -

############### Morphological rules ######################################################
############### Nouns, adjectives and adverbs ##########################################################

SFX F Y 178
SFX F e a e$
SFX F e ê e$
SFX F e êke e$
SFX F e êka e$
SFX F e ade e$
SFX F e î e$
SFX F e anê e$
SFX F e êno e$
SFX F 0 e [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 a [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êke [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êka [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ade [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 î [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 anê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êno [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ye [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ya [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yêke [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yêka [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yade [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yî [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yanê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yêno [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ek [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eki [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eke [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ay [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ey [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 aya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eka [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 an [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 on [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 o [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eyê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 û [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekeri [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eyî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekûn [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ikeri [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 andê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 erda [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 i [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ûn [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekêda [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 onê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 awa [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ardey [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayke [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekanê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekêk [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekêka [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ono [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ûno [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ada [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ara [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayanê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekon [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekên [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekênê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eray [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 erday [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eyêke [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 anî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 arda [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 arey [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayana [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 aykey [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayênda [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekda [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekdê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekere [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekêke [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekûndê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 er [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eri [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eyan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eyêda [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eyêka [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ûnê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eyanê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayêk [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 akan [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayanî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayêda [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayêka [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekîya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êyî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 atîya [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayano [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 aye [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayin [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ayîn [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 dî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekade [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekek [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekna [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ekêde [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 eye [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êda [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êk [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êkê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êkêda [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êy [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 êyê [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 îme [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ûnî [^aeêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yan [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ke [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yon [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 da [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 ka [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kî [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yay [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yeray [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yabi [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yekî [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yerday [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yi [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 k [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kade [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kan [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 nê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 y [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yayên [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yayêne [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yayênî [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yayîşê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yek [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yeki [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yera [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yeri [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yeya [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yo [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yono [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yonê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yêna [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yêne [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yûnê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yûnî [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kêda [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yanî [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yêk [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yeka [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yûn [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kanê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 no [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yin [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kêka [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 tî [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yey [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yêda [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kêk [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kêke [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kû [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 kûnê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 tene [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 tîya [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 tîye [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 verdiş [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yandê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yekê [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yinan [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yinî [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yu [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yîka [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yîya [aêiîouû] .
SFX F 0 yû [aêiîouû] .
