zza/zza-Latn.dic
Estonya/F po:feminine
Kurdîstûn/F po:feminine
Rwanda/F po:feminine
acîlîye/F po:feminine
alinç/F po:feminine
ame/F po:feminine
aqilşenikî/F po:feminine
arêdayene/XF po:verb is:infinitive1_transitive_active lem:arêdayene
astoriney/F po:feminine
awa-gemarine/F po:feminine
awr/F po:feminine
açarnayîye/F po:feminine
badûne/F po:feminine
balîsna/F po:feminine
baringanî/F po:feminine
bawerîye/F po:feminine
bedesawita/F po:feminine
berberîye/F po:feminine
besti/F po:feminine
bezira/F po:feminine
bihemlî/F po:feminine
birayên/F po:feminine
bizriki/F po:feminine
borsa/F po:feminine
buerîyê-qalorîfêr/F po:feminine
bêbinyatîye/F po:feminine
bêehlaqey/F po:feminine
bêhêşey/F po:feminine
bêmecalî/F po:feminine
bêrîyey/F po:feminine
bêweyîtîye/F po:feminine
bîdûn/F po:feminine
bûrani/F po:feminine
canmêrdî/F po:feminine
celleyîye/F po:feminine
cerahîye/F po:feminine
cinaza/F po:feminine
cixara/F po:feminine
cuw/F po:feminine
cîrgaya/F po:feminine
dadîkîye/F po:feminine
dardekerda/F po:feminine
dayîki/F po:feminine
dejinî/F po:feminine
deqa/F po:feminine
derzîna-lihêfan/F po:feminine
destweşîye/F po:feminine
dezayeyîye/F po:feminine
dileti/F po:feminine
dirvetî/F po:feminine
dolaba-kincan/F po:feminine
dostey/F po:feminine
duşmenatî/F po:feminine
dîsleksî/F po:feminine
edali/F po:feminine
elbike/F po:feminine
emoneti/F po:feminine
engîşti/F po:feminine
erjanîye/F po:feminine
estewrin/F po:feminine
ewa/F po:feminine
ezebi/F po:feminine
fasal/F po:feminine
fenere/F po:feminine
findedane/F po:feminine
fistiqe/F po:feminine
fîrketi/F po:feminine
ganweşîye/F po:feminine
gemare/F po:feminine
germaxinênî/F po:feminine
gijgeleke/F po:feminine
gimarênîye/F po:feminine
girêdayeyîye/F po:feminine
gogerçîni/F po:feminine
gostarmîye/F po:feminine
grûba-fişarî/F po:feminine
guinc/F po:feminine
gurnîk/F po:feminine
gêraz/F po:feminine
hagosi/F po:feminine
haçacike/F po:feminine
helekîyayene/XF po:verb is:infinitive1_intransitive_active lem:helekîyayene
hemserekîye/F po:feminine
herednayene/XF po:verb is:infinitive1_transitive_active lem:herednayene
hesemete/F po:feminine
hewic/F po:feminine
heşviliki/F po:feminine
hoybaşênî/F po:feminine
hêrsbîyaya/F po:feminine
hîsdarîye/F po:feminine
inci/F po:feminine
jûyênî/F po:feminine
kanî/F po:feminine
karmusîye/F po:feminine
kaxite/F po:feminine
kekvili/F po:feminine
kelpî/F po:feminine
kerge/F po:feminine
kerrê/F po:feminine
keyna-emiki/F po:feminine
kilawa-fîlikêne/F po:feminine
kirrîye/F po:feminine
koleya-to/F po:feminine
kontrolkerîye/F po:feminine
koçika-dêsan/F po:feminine
kuftaya-yalançî/F po:feminine
kurdîye/F po:feminine
kuxika-şîyaye/F po:feminine
kêna-xale/F po:feminine
kûrteki/F po:feminine
lapi/F po:feminine
lemey-çîlegi/F po:feminine
leyek/F po:feminine
linci/F po:feminine
loqantedarîye/F po:feminine
lulê-toqi/F po:feminine
lîyeçeg/F po:feminine
makînaya-gijikziwakerdişî/F po:feminine
mamûxe/F po:feminine
marşinge/F po:feminine
mazbutey/F po:feminine
mehşi/F po:feminine
menoşeki/F po:feminine
mermertiraşîye/F po:feminine
meymantîne/F po:feminine
mijloli/F po:feminine
mircane/F po:feminine
miteîtey/F po:feminine
mocla/F po:feminine
mosela/F po:feminine
mudirîya-mintiqa-ya-weqifan/F po:feminine
mumdane/F po:feminine
muslumanênî/F po:feminine
mêmaney/F po:feminine
mîrxasî/F po:feminine
mûreki/F po:feminine
nardane/F po:feminine
nefeli/F po:feminine
neqernayoxî/F po:feminine
newbedarey/F po:feminine
nihe/F po:feminine
nobeçîyî/F po:feminine
nuştoxi/F po:feminine
nêwesa-girane/F po:feminine
nîson/F po:feminine
odaya-îhaleyan/F po:feminine
ortaxî/F po:feminine
pahney/F po:feminine
pankey/F po:feminine
patike/F po:feminine
pederşahîye/F po:feminine
pergendîyê/F po:feminine
peyike/F po:feminine
pirakerdîye/F po:feminine
piskili/F po:feminine
pişqule/F po:feminine
porteqalêre/F po:feminine
purozini/F po:feminine
pêsîye/F po:feminine
pîley/F po:feminine
pîrtî/F po:feminine
qabqaline/F po:feminine
qaltaxî/F po:feminine
qarte/F po:feminine
qazaxe/F po:feminine
qeherîyayeyî/F po:feminine
qelişîyayene/XF po:verb is:infinitive1_intransitive_active lem:qelişîyayene
qermeçîyayê/F po:feminine
qespa/F po:feminine
qeşini/F po:feminine
qilûnci/F po:feminine
qirmiçîyayîye/F po:feminine
qisqonci/F po:feminine
qonzi/F po:feminine
qulli/F po:feminine
qurçine/F po:feminine
qîrrênî/F po:feminine
ramitbarîye/F po:feminine
raştîvînîya-newa/F po:feminine
reqûteq/F po:feminine
rigirewtî/F po:feminine
riştene/XF po:verb is:infinitive1_transitive_active lem:riştene
roşnaya-trafîkî/F po:feminine
rêxe/F po:feminine
rîyêşta/F po:feminine
sahate/F po:feminine
sate/F po:feminine
sefkanênî/F po:feminine
semawere/F po:feminine
serdoktorîye/F po:feminine
sermîyandarîye/F po:feminine
serxweşî/F po:feminine
sikitîye/F po:feminine
sindoqi/F po:feminine
sol/F po:feminine
sotemenîya-fosîlî/F po:feminine
sweli/F po:feminine
sûnzîyer/F po:feminine
taji/F po:feminine
tarîqate/F po:feminine
telebi/F po:feminine
terraqi/F po:feminine
tezê/F po:feminine
tolik/F po:feminine
tumi/F po:feminine
tîkile/F po:feminine
valêre/F po:feminine
verasanî/F po:feminine
vilakerîye/F po:feminine
virîyaya/F po:feminine
vîsti/F po:feminine
wazo/F po:feminine
weyî/F po:feminine
xalîtî/F po:feminine
xeleka-nîreyî/F po:feminine
xewirnayîye/F po:feminine
xirnike/F po:feminine
xumare/F po:feminine
yengîdinya/F po:feminine
zayene/XF po:verb is:infinitive1_intransitive_active lem:zayene
zerrîya-bele/F po:feminine
ziwayê/F po:feminine
zîzênî/F po:feminine
çarig/F po:feminine
çermroşîye/F po:feminine
çiqiryayeyê/F po:feminine
çuwereg/F po:feminine
îcra/F po:feminine
îyr/F po:feminine
şapqa/F po:feminine
şemitnayene/XF po:verb is:infinitive1_transitive_active lem:şemitnayene
şilfe/F po:feminine
şorbay-doy/F po:feminine
şîriney/F po:feminine
